src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@vaevav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aevav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaevlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aevlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahelduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vahelduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
vahetatav+A:vahetatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vahetuv+A:vahetuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vahtiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ahtiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vahutav+A:vahutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vaieldav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaikiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aikiv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
vaimustav+A:vaimustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vajav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vajav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vajuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vajuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@valdav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aldav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
valendav+A:valendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
valetav+A:valetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@valev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@valev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
valgustav+A:valgustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
valitav+A:valitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
valitsev+A:valitsev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@valiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@valiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
valjenev+A:valʲjenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vallandatav+A:vallandatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vallutav+A:vallutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
valmistatav+A:valʲmistatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
valmistuv+A:valʲmistuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@valmiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘alʲmiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
valutav+A:valutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
vananev+A:vananev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
vangistav+A:vangistav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vankuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ankuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vapustav+A:vapustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
varastav+A:varastav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
varisev+A:varisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
varitsev+A:varitsev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@varjav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘arjav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
vastanduv+A:vastanduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘astav MAGUS  "weight: 5 " ; 
vastutav+A:vastutav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vedav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vedav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vedelev+A:vedelev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@veerev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘eerev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@veetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘eetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@veetlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘eetlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vehkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ehkiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
venitatav+A:venitatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@veniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@veniv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
veretav+A:veretav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@verev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@verev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
veritsev+A:veritsev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vetruv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘etruv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vibreeriv+A:vibr˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vihatav+A:vihatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vihjav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ihjav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vihkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ihkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@viibiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘iibiv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
vilisev+A:vilisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
viljastav+A:vilʲjastav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vilkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ilkuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vingerdav+A:vingerdav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vinguv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘inguv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
virgutav+A:virgutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
virvendav+A:virvendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@visklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘isklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vohav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vohav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vonklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘onklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@voogav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘oogav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@voolav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘oolav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
vuhisev+A:vuhisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
võbelev+A:võbelev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
võbisev+A:võbisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õetav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
võidetav+A:võidetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
võidutsev+A:võidutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
võimaldav+A:võimaldav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võistlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õistlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võitlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õitlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võluv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@võluv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@võrdlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘õrdlev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
võrreldav+A:võrreldav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
võõrandatav+A:võõrandatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
võõrastav+A:võõrastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vägev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@vägev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
vähendatav+A:vähendatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vähendav+A:vähendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
väidetav+A:väidetav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
välditav+A:välʲditav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
välistav+A:välistav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
väljendav+A:välʲjendav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@väljuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘älʲjuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@välkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘älkuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vältav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ältav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vältiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘älʲtiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
värisev+A:värisev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
värskendav+A:värskendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
väsitav+A:väsitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@väänduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘äänduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@väänlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘äänlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vääriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘ääriv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@aetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘aetav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@andev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘andE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@haisev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘aisE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@haistev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘aistE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@heitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘eitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hoidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘oidE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@hüüdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@h˘üüdE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jooksev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ooksE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jootev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ootE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jõudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘õudE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@jättev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@j˘ättE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kaheldav+A:kaheldav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kaitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘aitsE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kandev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘andE2v MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
kardetav+A:kardetav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kartev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘artE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kastev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘astE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
kasutatav+A:kasutatav MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kattev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘attE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@keetev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘eetE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kestev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘estE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kiitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘iitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
kirjutatav+A:kirjutatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@koitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘oitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kostev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ostE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kurtev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘urtE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kuulev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘uulE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@köitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘öitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@kündev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘ündE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@küttev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@k˘üttE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘aitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laskev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘askE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@laulev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘aulE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@leidev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘eidE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
lepitav+A:lepitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@liitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘iitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@loitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘oitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lootev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘ootE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lõppev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘õppE2v MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@läitev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘äitE2v MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@lüpsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@l˘üpsE2v MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@maitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@m˘aitsE2v MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
